Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2108
City council, village board, county board, or tribal government; vote to make formal application.

Following the public hearing held pursuant to section 13-2107, the city council, village board, county board, or tribal government may vote to make formal application to the department for the creation of an enterprise zone or zones and take any additional appropriate action with regard to the creation of such zone or zones.

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 725, § 9.